Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB392.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 635.7 of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 635.7. Billing.--* * *(b.1) When an insurer reimburses for a nonnetwork EMS agency emergency medical service and the reimbursement payment is paid directly to an insurance policyholder, the payment shall be accompanied with a notification in writing that includes the following information:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 (1) the date the emergency medical service was performed;(2) the name of the EMS agency that performed the emergency medical service;(3) an itemized explanation of the claim amount and reimbursement amount issued by the insurer;(4) the EMS agency billing address that filed the claim for the emergency medical service performed; and(5) a disclosure that states:This reimbursement payment is issued to the policyholder (insert NAME), for a claim filed for nonnetwork emergency medical services on (insert DATE of emergency service). The reimbursement funds enclosed are to be used for the sole purpose of payment of a liability for emergency medical services outlined in this notification. The use of these funds for any other purpose other than to satisfy the emergency medical services liability may result in an insurance fraud claim against the policyholder or individual that received the emergency medical service on (insert DATE).(b.2) An insurer that reimburses for a nonnetwork EMS agency emergency medical service shall notify the EMS agency monthly that a claim payment has been issued by the insurer to the policyholder for the billing of a medically necessary emergency medical service.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0392PN0357 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425